Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.320

Month of the kindergartner.

September is the month of the kindergartner. Each September elementary schools are encouraged to determine a method to celebrate new kindergartners as they begin their life in K-12 education.

[ 2019 c 179 s 1.]